Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.200

Solicitation of endorsement fees. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

A person may not solicit from a candidate for public office, political committee, political party, or other person money or other property as a condition or consideration for an endorsement, article, or other communication in the news media promoting or opposing a candidate for public office, political committee, or political party.

[ 2024 c 164 s 462; 1995 c 397 s 25; 1993 c 2 s 17 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.480, 42.17.770.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—1995 c 397: See note following RCW 29B.40.020.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.